Illinois, session 104th, HB837.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Tax Lien Registration Act is amended 5by changing Section 1-1 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 750/1-1)7    Sec. 1-1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8State Tax Lien Registration Act. References in this Article to 9"this Act" mean this Article.10(Source: P.A. 100-22, eff. 1-1-18.)